Massachusetts, session 194th, S921.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1D of Chapter 69 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing
in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after clause (iii) the following
clause:-
(iv) (a) It is hereby declared to be the policy of the commonwealth to maximize federal
and state postsecondary financial aid options through the encouragement and requirement of
graduating students to submit the applicable application for federal and state financial aid.
Before graduating from high school, each student must submit a free application for
federal student aid, hereafter referred to as the FAFSA.
of 5

(b) A student is not required to comply with subsection (a) if: (1) the student’s parent or
guardian submits a signed form described in subsection (c) indicating that the parent or guardian
authorizes the student to decline to complete and submit the financial aid application; or (2) the
student signs and submits the form referenced in subsection (c) on the student’s own behalf if the
student is 18 years of age or older or legally emancipated; or (3) the student’s school files the
form referenced in subsection (c) to be approved by the school district, if the student has not
reached 18 years of age.
(c) The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop, and all school
districts shall adopt, 2 forms to be used for the purposes of subsection (b), as follows: A form to
be signed by a parent/guardian, or by a student over 18 years of age or legally emancipated. This
form shall be written in accessible language, translated into families’ preferred languages, and
require no personal information except for student and parent/guardian (if applicable) names and
signatures. The form shall not require any information on citizenship status.
A form filed by the school district on behalf of a student under the age of 18 who is not
legally emancipated. The form shall be signed by the principal of the student’s school and shall
include the following information: (a) attestation that the student meets all other graduation
requirements; (b) attestation that the school has made a good faith effort to contact the family
and to provide any support necessary to submit the FAFSA, including at least 3 personalized
communications in the family’s preferred language.
Prior to completion of high school, each school district shall ensure that every student
complies with subsection (a) or (b) and must provide to each high school student and, if
of 5

applicable, their parent or guardian any support or assistance necessary to comply with this
section.
(d) The commissioner shall provide guidance to districts related to the implementation of
this section, including the distribution of information related to this requirement, reporting
requirements for school districts and required communications to parents and guardians related
to all financial aid options for high school students. Each district must annually report to the
department of elementary and secondary education by September 30 the following: the number
of students completing and submitting the free application for federal student aid; the number of
students who received an exemption to this requirement through paragraph (iv) subsections
(b)(1), (b)(2) and (b)(3) separately and in combination, provided further that this data be broken
down by race, ethnicity, primary city or town of residence and such other categories that the
department may determine.
SECTION 2.
Section 2. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a
separate fund to be known as the FAFSA Trust Fund. The fund shall be administered by the
commissioner of elementary and secondary education. The fund shall be credited with: (i)
revenue from appropriations or other money authorized by the general court and specifically
designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) interest earned on such revenues; and (iii) funds from
public and private sources such as gifts, grants and donations to aid districts in supporting
students, parents and guardians with Free Application for Federal Student Aid submission.
Amounts credited to the fund shall not be subject to further appropriation and any money
remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund.
of 5

(b) Amounts credited to the fund may focus on underserved communities across the
commonwealth, including those school districts with high concentrations of economically
disadvantaged students, and may be expended, without further appropriation, by the
commissioner for the following purposes: (i) to assist with the implementation and execution of
section (a), including staff and administrator training; (ii) for the development of workshops and
other support services and systems; and (iii) for the collaboration with stakeholder and
community organizations to support students, parents, and guardians with Free Application for
Federal Student Aid submission.
(c) Amounts received from private sources shall be approved by the commissioner of
elementary and secondary education and subject to review before being deposited in the fund to
ensure that pledged funds are not accompanied by conditions, explicit or implicit, on the
implementation of FAFSA workshops or other programming that may be detrimental to students,
parents, guardians, school districts, or that places limitations or restrictions on how funds can be
used to support the implementation of this section. The review shall be made publicly available.
(d) Annually, not later than October 1, the commissioner shall report to the clerks of the
house of representatives and senate, the joint committee on education and the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the fund's activity. The report shall include, but not be limited
to: (i) the source and amount of funds received; (ii) the amounts distributed and the purpose of
expenditures from the fund, including but not limited to, funds expended to assist school districts
in meeting the requirements in section (a); (iii) any grants provided to high schools and other
stakeholder organizations; and (iv) anticipated revenue and expenditure projections for the next
year.
of 5

SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act shall take effect on October 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. Section 2 of this act shall take effect October 1, 2025.
of 5